Massachusetts, session 194th, H586.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section XXXXX.XX is added to _________________, to read:
XXXXX.XX.
(a) The department, in coordination with the department of public health and any other
entity the department deems appropriate, shall develop type 1 diabetes informational materials
for the parents and guardians of pupils. The informational materials shall undergo periodic
updates as necessary and be made available to each school district, county office of education,
and charter school through the department’s website.
(b) On and after January 1, 2026, the school district and governing body of a charter
school shall make the type 1 diabetes informational materials accessible in writing to the parent
or guardian of a student when the student is first enrolled in elementary school and again upon a
child’s entry into grade 6 with the information provided pursuant to Section XXXXX.
of 2

(c) Information provided to parents and guardians pursuant to this section may include,
but shall not be limited to, all of the following:
(1) A description of type 1 diabetes.
(2) A description of the risk factors and warning signs associated with type 1 diabetes.
(3) A recommendation regarding those students displaying warning signs associated with
type 1 diabetes that the parents or guardians of those students should immediately consult with
the student’s primary care provider to determine if immediate screening for type 1 diabetes is
appropriate.
(4) A description of the screening process for type 1 diabetes, the significance of its
stages (e.g., stage 1, stage 2, and stage 3), and the implications of test results identifying the
presence of stage 1, stage 2, and stage 3 type 1 diabetes.
(5) A recommendation that, following a type 1 diagnosis, parents or guardians should
consult with the student’s primary care provider to develop an appropriate treatment plan, which
may include consultation with and examination by a specialty care provider, including, but not
limited to, a properly qualified endocrinologist.
of 2